Utah statutes.
73-2-14.   Fees of state engineer -- Deposited as a dedicated credit.

(1)  The state engineer shall charge fees pursuant to Section 63J-1-504 for the following:

(a)  applications to appropriate water;

(b)  applications to temporarily appropriate water;

(c)  applications for permanent or temporary change;

(d)  applications for exchange;

(e)  applications for an extension of time in which to resume use of water;

(f)  applications to appropriate water, or make a permanent or temporary change, for use outside the state filed pursuant to Title 73, Chapter 3a, Water Exports;

(g)  groundwater recovery permits;

(h)  diligence claims for surface or underground water filed pursuant to Section 73-5-13;

(i)  republication of notice to water users after amendment of application where required by this title;

(j)  applications to segregate;

(k)  requests for an extension of time in which to submit proof of appropriation not to exceed 14 years after the date of approval of the application;

(l)  requests for an extension of time in which to submit proof of appropriation 14 years or more after the date of approval of the application;

(m)  groundwater recharge permits;

(n)  applications for a well driller's license, annual renewal of a well driller's license, and late annual renewal of a well driller's license;

(o)  certification of copies;

(p)  preparing copies of documents;

(q)  reports of water right conveyance; and

(r)  requests for a livestock water use certificate under Section 73-3-31.

(2)  Fees for the services specified in Subsections (1)(a) through (i) shall be based upon the rate of flow or volume of water.  If it is proposed to appropriate by both direct flow and storage, the fee shall be based upon either the rate of flow or annual volume of water stored, whichever fee is greater.

(3)  Fees collected under this section:

(a)  shall be deposited in the General Fund as a dedicated credit to be used by the Division of Water Rights; and

(b)  may only be used by the Division of Water Rights to:

(i)  meet the publication of notice requirements under this title;

(ii)  process reports of water right conveyance;

(iii)  process a request for a livestock water use certificate; and

(iv)  hire an employee to assist with processing an application.

